Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
PART 8. Transition Provisions for 2013 Amendments.

§ 8.9A-801.
Effective date of amendments.

In this part, “2013 amendments” means the amendments to this title that are enacted by the act of the 2012 Session of the General Assembly that enacted this Part 8.

The 2013 amendments are effective July 1, 2013.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-802.
Savings clause.

Pre-effective-date transactions or liens. Except as otherwise provided in this part, the 2013 amendments apply to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2013.

Pre-effective-date proceedings. The 2013 amendments do not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2013.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-803.
Security interest perfected before July 1, 2013.

Continuing perfection; perfection requirements satisfied. A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, is a perfected security interest under this title as amended by the 2013 amendments if, on July 1, 2013, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, are satisfied without further action.

Continuing perfection; perfection requirements not satisfied. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-805

, if, immediately before July 1, 2013, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, are not satisfied on July 1, 2013, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, are satisfied within one year after July 1, 2013.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-804.
Security interest unperfected before July 1, 2013.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, becomes a perfected security interest:

without further action, on July 1, 2013, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, are satisfied before or at that time; or

when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-805.
Effectiveness of action taken before July 1, 2013.

Pre-effective-date filing effective. The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2013, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments.

When pre-effective-date filing becomes ineffective. The 2013 amendments do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this title, as it existed before the 2013 amendments. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) and §

8.9A-806

, the financing statement ceases to be effective:

if the financing statement is filed in the Commonwealth, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had the 2013 amendments not taken effect; or

if the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at the earlier of:

the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or

June 30, 2018.

Continuation statement. The filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2013, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

Application of subsection (b)(2)(B) to transmitting utility financing statement. Subsection (b)(2)(B) applies to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this title, as it existed before the 2013 amendments, only to the extent that this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

Application of Part 5 (§

8.9A-501

et seq.). A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, and a continuation statement filed on or after July 1, 2013, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Part 5, as amended by the 2013 amendments, for an initial financing statement. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a decedent’s estate indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of §

8.9A-503(a)(2)

, as amended by the 2013 amendments. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to a property held in trust indicates that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of §

8.9A-503(a)(3)

, as amended by the 2013 amendments.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-806.
When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

Initial financing statement in lieu of continuation statement. The filing statement of an initial financing statement in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before the 2013 amendments take effect if:

the filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments;

the pre-effective-date financing statement was filed in an office in another state; and

the initial financing statement satisfies subsection (c).

Period of continued effectiveness. The filing of an initial financing statement under subsection (a) continues the effectiveness of the pre-effective-date financing statement:

if the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2013, for the period provided in §

8.9A-515

as §

8.9A-515

was in effect on June 30, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement; and

if the initial financing statement is filed on or after July 1, 2013, for the period provided in §

8.9A-515

, as amended by the 2013 amendments, with respect to an initial financing statement.

Requirements for initial financing statement under subsection (a). To be effective for purposes of subsection (a), an initial financing statement must:

satisfy the requirements of Part 5 (§

8.9A-501

et seq.), as amended by the 2013 amendments, for an initial financing statement;

identify the pre-effective-date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

indicate that the pre-effective-date financing statement remains effective.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-807.
Amendment of pre-effective-date financing statement.

“Pre-effective-date financing statement.” In this section, “pre-effective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013.

Applicable law. On and after July 1, 2013, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Method of amending; general rule. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), if the law of the Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended on and after July 1, 2013, only if:

the pre-effective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

;

an amendment is filed in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies §

8.9A-806(c)

; or

an initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies §

8.9A-806(c)

is filed in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

.

Method of amending; continuation. If the law of the Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, may be continued only under §

8.9A-805(c)

or (e) and §

8.9A-806

.

Method of amending; additional termination rule. Whether or not the law of the Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, in the Commonwealth may be terminated on or after July 1, 2013, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies §

8.9A-806(c)

has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this title, as amended by the 2013 amendments, as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-808.
Person entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

the secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

the filing is necessary under this part:

to continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013; or

to perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History.

2012, c. 155.

§ 8.9A-809.
Priority.

The 2013 amendments determine the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2013, this title, as it was in effect on June 30, 2013, determines priority.

History.

2012, c. 155.